ko: 미끼 호환성: 보일리; 옥수수; 덤벨; 메이즈; 견과류; 펠릿; 팝업; 타이거 너트; 와프터; 기타
pl: Zgodność przynęt: Kulka proteinowa; Kukurydza; Dumbells; Kukurydza twarda; Orzech; Pellet; Kulka pływająca (pop-up); Orzech tygrysi; Wafters; Inne
ru: Совместимость с приманкой: Бойл; Кукуруза; Дамбелс; Маис; Орех; Пеллетс; Поп-ап; Тигровый орех; Вафтерс; Другое
cs: Kompatibilita s návnadou: Boilie; Kukuřice; Dumbells; Krmná kukuřice; Ořech; Pelety; Pop-up; Tygří ořech; Wafters; Jiné
pt-PT: Compatibilidade do isco: Boilie; Milho; Dumbbell; Milho; Noz; Pellet; Pop-up; Chufa; Wafter; Outro
tr: Yem uyumluluğu: Boilie; Mısır; Dambıl; Yemlik mısır; Kuruyemiş; Pelet; Pop-up yem; Kaplan fıstığı; Wafter; Diğer
ja: ベイト適合性: ボイリー; コーン; ダンベル; メイズ; ナッツ; ペレット; ポップアップ; タイガーナッツ; ワフター; その他
it: Compatibilità dell'esca: Boilie; Mais; Dumbbell; Granoturco; Nocciola; Pellet; Pop-up; Tiger nut; Wafter; Altro
el: Συμβατότητα δολώματος: Boilie; Καλαμπόκι; Dumbbell; Καλαμπόκι (Maize); Ξηρός καρπός; Πέλετ; Pop-up; Tiger nut; Wafter; Άλλο
nb: Kompatbilitet for agn: Boilie; Mais; Dumbbell; Fôrmais; Nøtt; Pellet; Pop-up; Tigernøtt; Wafter; Annet
sl-SI: Združljivost vabe: Bojli; Koruza; Dumbbell; Koruza (maize); Oreh; Pelet; Pop-up; Tigrov orešček; Wafter; Drugo
ro-RO: Compatibilitatea momelii: Boilie; Porumb; Dumbbell; Porumb uscat; Nucă/Alună; Pelete; Pop-up; Alună tigrată; Wafter; Altele
hr-HR: Kompatibilnost mamaca: Boila; Kukuruz; Dumbbell; Kukuruz u zrnu; Orašasti plodovi; Peleti; Pop-up; Tigrov orah; Wafter; Ostalo
sk-SK: Kompatibilita návnady: Boilies; Kukurica; Dumbbells; Tvrdá kukurica; Orech; Pelety; Pop-up; Tigrí orech; Wafters; Iná
bg-BG: Съвместимост със стръв: Протеиново топче; Царевица; Дъмбел; Фуражна царевица; Ядка; Пелета; Pop-up; Тигров фъстък; Уафтър (Wafter); Друго
hu: Csali-kompatibilitás: Bojli; Kukorica; Dumbell; Takarmánykukorica; Dió; Pellet; Pop-up; Tigrismogyoró; Wafter; Egyéb
fi: Syötin yhteensopivuus: Boilie; Sokerimaissi; Dumbbell; Rehumaissi; Pähkinä; Pelletti; Pop-up; Tiikeripähkinä; Wafter; Muu
zh-TW: 餌料相容性: 煮沸餌; 玉米; 啞鈴餌; 飼料玉米; 堅果; 顆粒餌; 浮水餌; 油莎草; 懸浮餌; 其他
th: ความเข้ากันได้ของเหยื่อ: บอยลี่; ข้าวโพด; ดัมเบล; ข้าวโพดเลี้ยงสัตว์; ถั่ว; อาหารเม็ด; เม็ดป๊อปอัพ; ถั่วไทเกอร์นัท; วาฟเตอร์; อื่นๆ
es: Compatibilidad con cebo: Boilie; Maíz; Dumbbell; Maíz; Nuez; Pellet; Pop-up; Chufa; Wafter; Otro
pt-BR: Compatibilidade da isca: Boilie; Milho; Dumbbell; Milho; Noz; Pellet; Pop-up; Tiger nut; Wafter; Outro
zh-CN: 饵料兼容性: 水煮饵; 玉米; 哑铃饵; 老玉米; 坚果; 颗粒饵; 浮水饵; 虎坚果; 悬浮饵; 其他
nl: Aascompatibiliteit: Boilie; Maïs; Dumbbell; Harde maïs; Noot; Pellet; Pop-up; Tijgernoot; Wafter; Overig
sv: Kompatibilitet med bete: Boilie; Majs; Dumbbell; Fodermajs; Nöt; Pellets; Pop-up; Tigernöt; Wafter; Övrigt
da: Lokkemadskompatibilitet: Boilie; Majs; Dumbbell; Fodermajs; Nød; Pellet; Pop-up; Tigernød; Wafter; Andet
vi: Độ tương thích của mồi nhử: Mồi boilie; Ngô; Mồi hình quả tạ; Ngô hạt to; Hạt; Mồi viên; Mồi nổi; Củ gấu tàu; Mồi lửng; Khác
lt-LT: Jauko suderinamumas: Baltyminis kukulys; Kukurūzai; Dumbbell formos jaukas; Pašariniai kukurūzai; Riešutas; Granulė; Plaukiantis jaukas (Pop-up); Tigrinis riešutas; Subalansuotas jaukas (Wafter); Kita
fr: Compatibilité des appâts: Bouillette; Maïs doux; Dumbbell; Maïs; Noix; Pellet; Pop-up; Noix tigrée; Wafter; Autre
de: Köderart: Boilie; Mais; Dumbbell; Mais; Nuss; Pellet; Pop-up; Tigernuss; Wafter; Sonstige
en: Bait compatibility: Boilie; Corn; Dumbbell; Maize; Nut; Pellet; Pop-up; Tiger nut; Wafter; Other